Nebraska, session 109, LB275A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $329,347 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 33, to aid in carrying out
the provisions of Legislative Bill 275, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for FY2025-26 or
$95,442 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General Fund for
FY2025-26 and (2) $629,165 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 354, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 275, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 $-0-
General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $629,165 General
Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-